Maryland, session 2025, SB0555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–357.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “REASONABLY ANTICIPATED LITIGATION” MEANS A
SITUATION WHERE THERE IS CONCRETE EVIDENCE THAT LITIGATION IS EXPECTED
TO OCCUR BASED ON CURRENT FACTS AND CIRCUMSTANCES.
(A) (B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A RECORD THAT:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0555*

SENATE BILL 555
(1) IS A COURT RECORD; OR
(2) PERTAINS TO LITIGATION THAT HAS BEEN FINALLY ADJUDICATED
OR OTHERWISE SETTLED.
(B) (C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) (D) OF THIS SECTION, A CUSTODIAN
MAY DENY INSPECTION OF A RECORD PERTAINING TO CREATED FOR THE PURPOSES
OF PENDING OR REASONABLY ANTICIPATED LITIGATION TO WHICH:
(1) THE STATE, A STATE AGENCY, OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF
THE STATE IS OR MAY BE A PARTY; OR
(2) AN OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE OF THE STATE OR A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE, BECAUSE OF THAT PERSON’S OFFICE OR EMPLOYMENT,
IS OR MAY BE A PARTY.
(C) (D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT ANY
RIGHT OR OPPORTUNITY GRANTED BY STATUTE OR COURT RULE FOR A PARTY TO
LITIGATION TO RECEIVE DISCOVERY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.